Illinois, session 104th, SB2927.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by adding Section 605-1119 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/605-1119 new)8    Sec. 605-1119. Study on strategies to protect jobs that 9are at risk of loss due to automation.10    (a) The Department, in consultation with the Department of 11Labor, shall conduct a comprehensive study to identify 12strategies to protect jobs that are at risk of loss due to 13artificial intelligence, as defined in Section 2-101 of the 14Illinois Human Rights Act. 15    (b) The study shall examine the impact of artificial 16intelligence on the Illinois workforce and propose 17recommendations to protect workers from job displacement due 18to artificial intelligence. 19    (c) The study shall include, but shall not be limited to, 20the following: 21        (1) an analysis of the current state of artificial 22    intelligence and its likely impact on the State's labor 23    market conditions, including data on past and projected   SB2927- 2 -LRB104 19652 HLH 33101 b1    job displacement; 2        (2) an analysis of how the labor market impact might 3    reshape the State's key industries, occupations, and 4    foundational skill sets; 5        (3) proposed initiatives to stimulate economic growth, 6    create jobs, and enhance talent development in the face of 7    artificial intelligence-related changes; 8        (4) recommendations for legal regulations or policy 9    changes needed to ensure the responsible and ethical use 10    of artificial intelligence in the State while protecting 11    the rights of Illinois citizens; 12        (5) recommendations on ways to encourage artificial 13    intelligence innovation and entrepreneurship and 14    strategies to support workers displaced by artificial 15    intelligence; 16        (6) proposed policy changes related to workforce 17    development, educational systems, and research 18    opportunities for colleges and universities in the State; 19        (7) recommendations of ways to promote transparency 20    and accountability for the use of artificial intelligence 21    technologies by measuring, monitoring, and reporting 22    outcomes and progress; and 23        (8) data and recommendations regarding job 24    displacement of workers from disproportionately impacted 25    communities. 26    (d) The Department shall solicit input from labor leaders,   SB2927- 3 -LRB104 19652 HLH 33101 b1technology experts, industry leaders, and gig workers. 2    (e) The Department shall submit a final report to the 3General Assembly and the Governor no later than December 31, 42026. The report shall include findings, recommendations, and 5potential statutory language to update Illinois law. The 6Department shall make the report available to the public on 7its website. 8    (f) This Section is repealed on December 31, 2027.  9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.